Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4003.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 414.025 is amended to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and 413, unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation by a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is working under a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician whose authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 91

HB 4003
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an individual’s mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient treatment in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s mental or
physical health.
(5) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance use disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069 or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health worker” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dental subcontractor” means a prepaid managed care health services organization that en-
ters into a noncomprehensive risk contract with a coordinated care organization or the Oregon
Health Authority to provide dental services to medical assistance recipients.
(10) “Doula” means a trained professional who provides continuous physical, emotional and in-
formational support to an individual during pregnancy, labor and delivery or the postpartum period
to help the individual achieve the healthiest and most satisfying experience possible.
(11) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for enroll-
ment in a coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by
Title XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(12)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and has experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
[2]

HB 4003
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(13) “Global budget” means a total amount established prospectively by the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a coordinated care organization for the delivery of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(14) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health Benefit Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(15) “Health services” means [at least so much of] each of the following [as are] services, to the
extent funded by the Legislative Assembly [based upon the prioritized list of health services compiled
by the Health Evidence Review Commission under ORS 414.690]:
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health clinician or other licensed practitioner within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal law that may be included in the state’s medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(16) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(17)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families in a pa-
tient centered primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
[3]

HB 4003
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(18) “Investments and savings” means cash, securities as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings as the department or
the authority may establish by rule that are available to the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(19) “Medical assistance” means so much of the medical, mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed by the authority according to the
standards established pursuant to ORS 414.065, including premium assistance under ORS 414.115 and
414.117, payments made for services provided under an insurance or other contractual arrangement
and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health services and for services de-
scribed in ORS 414.710.
(20) “Medical assistance” includes any care or services for any individual who is a patient in
a medical institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(21) “Mental health drug” means a type of legend drug, as defined in ORS 414.325, specified by
the Oregon Health Authority by rule, including but not limited to:
(a) Therapeutic class 7 ataractics-tranquilizers; and
(b) Therapeutic class 11 psychostimulants-antidepressants.
(22) “Patient centered primary care home” means a health care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards established by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(23) “Peer support specialist” means any of the following individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder.
(24) “Peer wellness specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665 and who is responsible for assessing mental health and substance
use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization through
community outreach, assisting members with access to available services and resources, addressing
barriers to services and providing education and information about available resources for individ-
uals with mental health or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma and discrimination
toward consumers of mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist the member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
[4]

HB 4003
(25) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs of the patient as identified through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(26) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who provides information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make the best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
(27) “Prepaid managed care health services organization” means a managed dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with the authority under ORS 414.654
or with a coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide health services to
medical assistance recipients.
(28) “Quality measure” means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks identi-
fied by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and the metrics and scoring subcommittee in
accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 413.022 and the quality metrics developed by the Behavioral
Health Committee in accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
(29)(a) “Quality of life in general measure” means an assessment of the value, effectiveness or
cost-effectiveness of a treatment that gives greater value to a year of life lived in perfect health than
the value given to a year of life lived in less than perfect health.
(b) “Quality of life in general measure” does not mean an assessment of the value, effectiveness
or cost-effectiveness of a treatment during a clinical trial in which a study participant is asked to
rate the participant’s physical function, pain, general health, vitality, social functions or other sim-
ilar domains.
(30) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes, “re-
sources” does not include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
(31) “Social determinants of health” means:
(a) Nonmedical factors that influence health outcomes;
(b) The conditions in which individuals are born, grow, work, live and age; and
(c) The forces and systems that shape the conditions of daily life, such as economic policies and
systems, development agendas, social norms, social policies, racism, climate change and political
systems.
(32) “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including physical, behavioral and
oral health, and increases the capacity of the community to meet the health care needs of its resi-
dents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
[5]

HB 4003
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
(33)(a) “Youth support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who, based on a similar life experience, provides supportive
services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 2. ORS 414.065 is amended to read:
414.065. (1)(a) Consistent with ORS 414.690, 414.710, 414.712 and 414.766 and other statutes
governing the provision of and payments for health services in medical assistance, the Oregon
Health Authority shall [determine], subject to such revisions as it may make from time to time and
to legislative funding:
(A) Determine the types and extent of health services to be provided to each eligible group of
recipients of medical assistance in accordance with federal laws governing mandatory and op-
tional state medical assistance services.
(B) Establish by rule standards, including a definition of medical necessity, medical neces-
sity criteria and outcome and quality measures, to be observed in the provision of health services.
(C) Determine the number of days of health services toward the cost of which medical assist-
ance funds will be expended in the care of any person.
(D) Establish reasonable fees, charges, daily rates and global payments for meeting the costs
of providing health services to an applicant or recipient.
(E) Establish reasonable fees for professional medical and dental services which may be based
on usual and customary fees in the locality for similar services.
(F) Determine the amount and application of any copayment or other similar cost-sharing pay-
ment that the authority may require a recipient to pay toward the cost of health services.
(b) The authority shall adopt rules:
(A) Establishing timelines for payment of health services under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(B) Defining the role of the clinical coverage policies developed under ORS 414.690 in de-
termining the extent of health services to be provided to medical assistance recipients.
(C) Prescribing an appeal process for denials of coverage that allows for individual med-
ical review.
(2) In [making the determinations] performing the actions under subsection (1) of this section
and in the imposition of any utilization controls on access to health services, the authority may not
consider a quality of life in general measure, either directly or by considering a source that relies
on a quality of life in general measure.
(3) The types and extent of health services and the amounts to be paid in meeting the costs
thereof, as determined and fixed by the authority and within the limits of funds available therefor,
shall be the total available for medical assistance, and payments for such medical assistance shall
be the total amounts from medical assistance funds available to providers of health services in
meeting the costs thereof.
(4) Except for payments under a cost-sharing plan, payments made by the authority for medical
[6]

HB 4003
assistance shall constitute payment in full for all health services for which such payments of medical
assistance were made.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Human Services shall be
responsible for determining the payment for Medicaid-funded long term care services and for con-
tracting with the providers of long term care services.
(6) In determining a global budget for a coordinated care organization:
(a) The allocation of the payment, the risk and any cost savings shall be determined by the
governing body of the organization;
(b) The authority shall consider the community health assessment conducted by the organization
in accordance with ORS 414.577 and reviewed annually, and the organization’s health care costs;
and
(c) The authority shall take into account the organization’s provision of innovative, nontradi-
tional health services.
(7) Under the supervision of the Governor, the authority may work with the Centers for Medi-
care and Medicaid Services to develop, in addition to global budgets, payment streams:
(a) To support improved delivery of health care to recipients of medical assistance; and
(b) That are funded by coordinated care organizations, counties or other entities other than the
state whose contributions qualify for federal matching funds under Title XIX or XXI of the Social
Security Act.
SECTION 3. ORS 414.689 is amended to read:
414.689. (1) The Health Evidence Review Commission shall select one of its members as chair-
person and another as vice chairperson, for terms and with duties and powers the commission de-
termines necessary for the performance of the functions of the offices.
(2) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(3) The commission shall meet at least four times per year at a place, day and hour determined
by the chairperson. The commission also shall meet at other times and places specified by the call
of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the commission. All meetings and deliberations
of the commission shall be in accordance with ORS 192.610 to 192.690. The commission may not meet
in executive session to hear evidence from an advisory committee or subcommittee or a panel of
experts or to deliberate on matters presented by an advisory committee or subcommittee or a panel
of experts.
(4) The commission may use advisory committees or subcommittees whose members are ap-
pointed by the chairperson of the commission subject to approval by a majority of the members of
the commission. The advisory committees or subcommittees may contain experts appointed by the
chairperson and a majority of the members of the commission. The conditions of service of the ex-
perts will be determined by the chairperson and a majority of the members of the commission.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff and support services to the commission.
(6) The commission shall adopt by rule practices to prevent undue influence by interested
parties.
SECTION 4. ORS 414.690 is amended to read:
414.690. (1) The Health Evidence Review Commission shall regularly solicit testimony and in-
formation from [stakeholders] interested parties representing consumers, advocates, providers, car-
riers and employers in conducting the work of the commission.
(2) The commission shall actively solicit public involvement through a public meeting process
[7]

HB 4003
to guide health resource allocation decisions that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Providing members of the public the opportunity to provide input on the selection of any
vendor that provides research and analysis to the commission; and
(b) Inviting public comment on any research or analysis tool or health economic measures to
be relied upon by the commission in the commission’s decision-making.
(3)(a) The commission shall develop and maintain [a list of health services ranked by priority,
from the most important to the least important, representing the comparative benefits of each service to
the population to be served] clinical coverage policies that include:
(A) Diagnosis and treatment code pairings that indicate which health services are med-
ically necessary for which conditions; and
(B) Coverage guidelines regarding medically necessary health services.
(b) The clinical coverage policies developed under this section must be consistent with
the medical necessity definition established by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
414.065 and federal laws governing mandatory and optional state medical assistance
services.
[(b)] (c) Except as provided in ORS 414.701, the commission may not rely upon any quality of
life in general measures, either directly or by considering research or analysis that relies on a
quality of life in general measure, in determining:
(A) Whether a service is cost-effective;
(B) Whether a service is recommended; or
(C) The value of a service.
[(c)] (d) The [list] clinical coverage policies developed under this section must be submitted
by the commission pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and [is] are not subject to alteration
by any other state agency.
(4) In order to encourage effective and efficient medical evaluation and treatment, the commis-
sion:
(a) [May include clinical practice guidelines in its prioritized list of services. The commission] Shall
actively solicit testimony and information from the medical community and the public to build a
consensus on clinical [practice guidelines] coverage policies developed by the commission.
(b) May include statements of intent in its [prioritized list of services] clinical coverage
policies. Statements of intent should give direction on coverage decisions where medical codes and
[clinical practice] coverage guidelines cannot convey the intent of the commission.
(c) Shall consider both the clinical effectiveness and cost-effectiveness, according to peer-
reviewed medical literature, of health services, including drug therapies, in [determining their rel-
ative importance using peer-reviewed medical literature] developing clinical coverage policies.
(5) The commission shall report [the prioritized list of services] any changes to the clinical
coverage policies developed under this section to the Oregon Health Authority for budget deter-
minations by July 1 of each even-numbered year.
(6) The commission shall make its report during each regular session of the Legislative Assem-
bly and shall submit a copy of its report to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Represen-
tatives and the President of the Senate and post to the Oregon Health Authority’s website, along
with a solicitation of public comment, an assessment of the impact on access to medically necessary
treatment and services by persons with disabilities or chronic illnesses resulting from the
commission’s prior use of any quality of life in general measures or any research or analysis that
referred to or relied upon a quality of life in general measure.
[8]

HB 4003
(7) The commission may alter the [list] clinical coverage policies developed under this section
during the interim only as follows:
(a) To make technical changes to correct errors and omissions;
(b) To accommodate changes due to advancements in medical technology or new data regarding
health outcomes;
(c) To accommodate changes to [clinical practice] coverage guidelines; and
(d) To add or modify statements of intent that clarify the [prioritized list] commission’s clin-
ical coverage policies.
[(8) If a service is deleted or added during an interim and no new funding is required, the com-
mission shall report to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate.
However, if a service to be added requires increased funding to avoid discontinuing another service,
the commission shall report to the Emergency Board to request the funding.]
(8) If the commission changes the clinical coverage policies developed under this section
during an interim, the commission shall report the change to the authority. If the change
requires increased funding, the authority may request additional funding from the Emer-
gency Board.
(9) [The prioritized list of services remains] Changes to the clinical coverage policies devel-
oped under this section, as reported under subsection (5) of this section, shall remain in effect
for a two-year period beginning no earlier than October 1 of each odd-numbered year.
(10)(a) As used in this section, “peer-reviewed medical literature” means scientific studies
printed in journals or other publications that publish original manuscripts only after the manuscripts
have been critically reviewed by unbiased independent experts for scientific accuracy, validity and
reliability.
(b) “Peer-reviewed medical literature” does not include internal publications of pharmaceutical
manufacturers.
SECTION 5. ORS 414.701 is amended to read:
414.701. (1) As used in this section, “peer-reviewed medical literature” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 414.690.
(2) The Health Evidence Review Commission, in [ranking health services or developing
guidelines] developing clinical coverage policies under ORS 414.690 or in assessing medical tech-
nologies under ORS 414.698, and the Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee, in considering a rec-
ommendation for a drug to be included on any preferred drug list or on the Practitioner-Managed
Prescription Drug Plan:
(a) May not rely solely on the results of comparative effectiveness research but must evaluate
a range of research and analysis, including peer-reviewed medical literature that:
(A) Studies health outcomes that are priorities for persons with disabilities who experience
specific diseases or illnesses, through surveys or other methods of identifying priority outcomes for
individuals who experience the diseases or illnesses;
(B) Studies subgroups of patients who experience specific diseases or illnesses, to ensure con-
sideration of any important differences and clinical characteristics applicable to the subgroups; and
(C) Considers the full range of relevant, peer-reviewed medical literature and avoids harm to
patients caused by undue emphasis on evidence that is deemed inconclusive of clinical differences
without further investigation.
(b) May consider research or analyses that reference a quality of life in general measure only
if:
[9]

HB 4003
(A) The staff of the commission includes an individual who:
(i) Is trained in identifying bias and discrimination in medical research and analyses;
(ii) Is not involved in research evaluation and recommendations for a given condition-treatment
pair on the prioritized list subject to the commission’s review; and
(iii) Determines that any of a researcher’s conclusions and analyses about the value or cost-
effectiveness of a treatment, that were relied upon by the staff of the commission in making a rec-
ommendation regarding the treatment, did not rely upon and were not influenced by the quality of
life in general measure; and
(B) All references to the quality of life in general measure are redacted from the research or
analyses before the research or analyses are presented to the commission or to any advisory com-
mittee or subcommittees used or consulted by the commission.
(3) The commission may not contract with a single vendor to provide or compile research and
analysis that is considered by the commission, and the commission shall publicly disclose, regarding
vendors providing or compiling research or analysis to the commission:
(a) The vendors’ funding sources; and
(b) Any conflicts of interest that a vendor may have with respect to the research and analysis
provided.
SECTION 6. ORS 414.735 is amended to read:
414.735. (1) If insufficient resources are available during a contract period:
(a) The population of eligible persons determined by law may not be reduced.
(b) The reimbursement rate for providers and plans established under the contractual agreement
may not be reduced.
(2) In the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section, reimbursement [shall] may
be adjusted by reducing the health services for the eligible population [by eliminating services in the
order of priority recommended by the Health Evidence Review Commission, starting with the least im-
portant and progressing toward the most important]. The Oregon Health Authority shall consult
with the Health Evidence Review Commission before implementing a significant reduction in
health services.
(3) The [Oregon Health] authority shall obtain the approval of the Legislative Assembly, or the
Emergency Board if the Legislative Assembly is not in session, before instituting the reductions. In
addition, providers contracting to provide health services under [ORS 414.591, 414.631 and 414.688
to 414.745] this chapter must be notified at least two weeks prior to any legislative consideration
of such reductions. Any reductions made under this section shall take effect no sooner than 60 days
following final legislative action approving the reductions.
(4) This section does not apply to reductions made by the Legislative Assembly in a legislatively
adopted or approved budget.
SECTION 7. ORS 414.325 is amended to read:
414.325. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Legend drug” means any drug requiring a prescription by a practitioner, as defined in ORS
689.005.
(b) “Urgent medical condition” means a medical condition that arises suddenly, is not life-
threatening and requires prompt treatment to avoid the development of more serious medical prob-
lems.
(2) A licensed practitioner may prescribe such drugs under this chapter as the practitioner in
the exercise of professional judgment considers appropriate for the diagnosis or treatment of the
[10]

HB 4003
patient in the practitioner’s care and within the scope of practice. Prescriptions shall be dispensed
in the generic form pursuant to ORS 689.515 and pursuant to rules of the Oregon Health Authority
unless the practitioner prescribes otherwise and an exception is granted by the authority.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the authority shall place no limit
on the type of legend drug that may be prescribed by a practitioner, but the authority shall pay only
for drugs in the generic form unless an exception has been granted by the authority.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, an exception must be applied for and granted
before the authority is required to pay for minor tranquilizers and amphetamines and amphetamine
derivatives, as defined by rule of the authority.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section and except as provided in paragraph
(b) of this subsection, the authority is authorized to:
(A) Withhold payment for a legend drug when federal financial participation is not available;
and
(B) Require prior authorization of payment for drugs that the authority has determined should
be limited to those conditions generally recognized as appropriate by the medical profession.
(b) The authority may not require prior authorization for:
(A) Therapeutic classes of nonsedating antihistamines and nasal inhalers, as defined by rule by
the authority, when prescribed by an allergist for treatment of any of the following conditions, as
described by the Health Evidence Review Commission [on the funded portion of its prioritized list of
services] in the clinical coverage policies developed under ORS 414.690:
(i) Asthma;
(ii) Sinusitis;
(iii) Rhinitis; or
(iv) Allergies.
(B) Any mental health drug prescribed for a medical assistance recipient if:
(i) The claims history available to the authority shows that the recipient has been in a course
of treatment with the drug during the preceding 365-day period; or
(ii) The prescriber specifies on the prescription “dispense as written” or includes the notation
“D.A.W.” or words of similar meaning.
(6) The authority shall pay a rural health clinic for a legend drug prescribed and dispensed un-
der this chapter by a licensed practitioner at the rural health clinic for an urgent medical condition
if:
(a) There is not a pharmacy within 15 miles of the clinic;
(b) The prescription is dispensed for a patient outside of the normal business hours of any
pharmacy within 15 miles of the clinic; or
(c) No pharmacy within 15 miles of the clinic dispenses legend drugs under this chapter.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 414.334, the authority may conduct prospective drug utilization review
in accordance with ORS 414.351 to 414.414.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the authority may pay a pharmacy for a par-
ticular brand name drug rather than the generic version of the drug after notifying the pharmacy
that the cost of the particular brand name drug, after receiving discounted prices and rebates, is
equal to or less than the cost of the generic version of the drug.
(9)(a) Within 180 days after the United States patent expires on an immunosuppressant drug
used in connection with an organ transplant, the authority shall determine whether the drug is a
narrow therapeutic index drug.
[11]

HB 4003
(b) As used in this subsection, “narrow therapeutic index drug” means a drug that has a narrow
range in blood concentrations between efficacy and toxicity and requires therapeutic drug concen-
tration or pharmacodynamic monitoring.
SECTION 8. ORS 414.698 is amended to read:
414.698. (1) The Health Evidence Review Commission shall conduct comparative effectiveness
research of medical technologies selected in accordance with ORS 414.695. The commission may
conduct the research by comprehensive review of the comparative effectiveness research undertaken
by recognized state, national or international entities. The commission may consider evidence re-
lating to prescription drugs that is relevant to a medical technology assessment but may not conduct
a drug class evidence review or medical technology assessment solely of a prescription drug. The
commission shall disseminate the research findings to health care consumers, providers and third-
party payers and to other interested [stakeholders] parties.
(2) The commission shall develop or identify and shall disseminate evidence-based health care
guidelines for use by providers, consumers and purchasers of health care in Oregon.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority shall vigorously pursue health care purchasing strategies that
adopt the research findings described in subsection (1) of this section and the evidence-based health
care guidelines described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 9. ORS 414.780 is amended to read:
414.780. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health coverage” means mental health treatment and services and substance use
disorder treatment or services reimbursed by a coordinated care organization.
(b) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Mental health treatment and services” means the treatment of or services provided to ad-
dress any condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the mental
disorders section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
(d) “Nonquantitative treatment limitation” means a limitation that is not expressed numerically
but otherwise limits the scope or duration of behavioral health coverage, such as medical necessity
criteria or other utilization review.
(e) “Substance use disorder treatment and services” means the treatment of and any services
provided to address any condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed
in the substance use section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
(2) No later than March 1 of each calendar year, the Oregon Health Authority shall prescribe
the form and manner for each coordinated care organization to report to the authority, on or before
June 1 of the calendar year, information about the coordinated care organization’s compliance with
mental health parity requirements, including but not limited to the following:
(a) The specific plan or coverage terms or other relevant terms regarding the nonquantitative
treatment limitations and a description of all mental health or substance use disorder benefits and
medical or surgical benefits to which each such term applies in each respective benefits classifica-
tion.
(b) The factors used to determine that the nonquantitative treatment limitations will apply to
mental health or substance use disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
[12]

HB 4003
(c) The evidentiary standards used for the factors identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection,
when applicable, provided that every factor is defined, and any other source or evidence relied upon
to design and apply the nonquantitative treatment limitations to mental health or substance use
disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
(d) The number of denials of coverage of mental health treatment and services, substance use
disorder treatment and services and medical and surgical treatment and services, the percentage of
denials that were appealed, the percentage of appeals that upheld the denial and the percentage of
appeals that overturned the denial.
(e) The percentage of claims for behavioral health coverage and for coverage of medical and
surgical treatments that were paid to in-network providers and the percentage of such claims that
were paid to out-of-network providers.
(f) Other data or information the authority deems necessary to assess a coordinated care
organization’s compliance with mental health parity requirements.
(3) Coordinated care organizations must demonstrate in the documentation submitted under
subsection (2) of this section, that the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards and other factors
used to apply nonquantitative treatment limitation to mental health or substance use disorder
treatment, as written and in operation, are comparable to and are applied no more stringently that
the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards and other factors used to apply nonquantitative
treatment limitations to medical or surgical treatments in the same classification.
(4) Each calendar year the authority, in collaboration with individuals representing behavioral
health treatment providers, community mental health programs, coordinated care organizations, the
Consumer Advisory Council established in ORS 430.073 and consumers of mental health or substance
use disorder treatment, shall, based on the information reported under subsection (2) of this section,
identify and assess:
(a) Coordinated care organizations’ compliance with the requirements for parity between the
behavioral health coverage and the coverage of medical and surgical treatment in the medical as-
sistance program; and
(b) The authority’s compliance with the requirements for parity between the behavioral health
coverage and the coverage of medical and surgical treatment in the medical assistance program for
individuals who are not enrolled in a coordinated care organization.
(5) No later than December 31 of each calendar year, the authority shall submit a report to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to mental or behavioral health, in the man-
ner provided in ORS 192.245, that includes:
(a) The authority’s findings under subsection (4) of this section on compliance with rules re-
garding mental health parity, including a comparison of coverage for members of coordinated care
organizations to coverage for medical assistance recipients who are not enrolled in coordinated care
organizations as applicable; and
(b) An assessment of:
(A) The adequacy of the provider network as prescribed by the authority by rule.
(B) The timeliness of access to mental health and substance use disorder treatment and services,
as prescribed by the authority by rule.
(C) The criteria used by each coordinated care organization to determine medical necessity and
behavioral health coverage, including each coordinated care organization’s payment protocols and
procedures.
(D) Data on services that are requested but that coordinated care organizations are not required
[13]

HB 4003
to provide.
(E) The consistency of credentialing requirements for behavioral health treatment providers
with the credentialing of medical and surgical treatment providers.
(F) The utilization review, as defined by the authority by rule, applied to behavioral health
coverage compared to coverage of medical and surgical treatments.
(G) The specific findings and conclusions reached by the authority with respect to the coverage
of mental health and substance use disorder treatment and the authority’s analysis that indicates
that the coverage is or is not in compliance with this section.
(H) The specific findings and conclusions of the authority demonstrating a coordinated care
organization’s compliance with this section and with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental
Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (P.L. 110-343) and rules adopted thereunder.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b)(D) of this section, this section does not require co-
ordinated care organizations to report data on services that are not [funded on the prioritized list
of health services compiled by the Health Evidence Review Commission under ORS 414.690] covered
health services under the state medical assistance program, as determined under ORS
414.065 and 414.690.
SECTION 10. ORS 415.500 is amended to read:
415.500. As used in this section and ORS 415.501 and 415.505:
(1) “Corporate affiliation” has the meaning prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,
including:
(a) Any relationship between two organizations that reflects, directly or indirectly, a partial or
complete controlling interest or partial or complete corporate control; and
(b) Transactions that merge tax identification numbers or corporate governance.
(2) “Essential services” means:
(a) Services that are [funded on the prioritized list described in ORS 414.690] covered under the
state medical assistance program, as determined under ORS 414.065 and 414.690; and
(b) Services that are essential to achieve health equity.
(3) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(4)(a) “Health care entity” includes:
(A) An individual health professional licensed or certified in this state;
(B) A hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015, or hospital system, as defined by the authority by rule;
(C) A carrier, as defined in ORS 743B.005, that offers a health benefit plan in this state;
(D) A Medicare Advantage plan;
(E) A coordinated care organization or a prepaid managed care health services organization, as
both terms are defined in ORS 414.025; and
(F) Any other entity that has as a primary function the provision of health care items or ser-
vices or that is a parent organization of, or is an entity closely related to, an entity that has as a
primary function the provision of health care items or services.
(b) “Health care entity” does not include:
(A) Long term care facilities, as defined in ORS 442.015.
(B) Facilities licensed and operated under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(5) “Health equity” has the meaning prescribed by the Oregon Health Policy Board and adopted
by the authority by rule.
(6)(a) “Material change transaction” means:
(A) A transaction in which at least one party had average revenue of $25 million or more in the
[14]

HB 4003
preceding three fiscal years and another party:
(i) Had an average revenue of at least $10 million in the preceding three fiscal years; or
(ii) In the case of a new entity, is projected to have at least $10 million in revenue in the first
full year of operation at normal levels of utilization or operation as prescribed by the authority by
rule.
(B) If a transaction involves a health care entity in this state and an out-of-state entity, a
transaction that otherwise qualifies as a material change transaction under this paragraph that may
result in increases in the price of health care or limit access to health care services in this state.
(b) “Material change transaction” does not include:
(A) A clinical affiliation of health care entities formed for the purpose of collaborating on clin-
ical trials or graduate medical education programs.
(B) A medical services contract or an extension of a medical services contract.
(C) An affiliation that:
(i) Does not impact the corporate leadership, governance or control of an entity; and
(ii) Is necessary, as prescribed by the authority by rule, to adopt advanced value-based payment
methodologies to meet the health care cost growth targets under ORS 442.386.
(D) Contracts under which one health care entity, for and on behalf of a second health care
entity, provides patient care and services or provides administrative services relating to, supporting
or facilitating the provision of patient care and services, if the second health care entity:
(i) Maintains responsibility, oversight and control over the patient care and services; and
(ii) Bills and receives reimbursement for the patient care and services.
(E) Transactions in which a participant that is a health center as defined in 42 U.S.C. 254b,
while meeting all of the participant’s obligations, acquires, affiliates with, partners with or enters
into any agreement with another entity unless the transaction would result in the participant no
longer qualifying as a health center under 42 U.S.C. 254b.
(7)(a) “Medical services contract” means a contract to provide medical or mental health services
entered into by:
(A) A carrier and an independent practice association;
(B) A carrier, coordinated care organization, independent practice association or network of
providers and one or more providers, as defined in ORS 743B.001;
(C) An independent practice association and an individual health professional or an organization
of health care providers;
(D) Medical, dental, vision or mental health clinics; or
(E) A medical, dental, vision or mental health clinic and an individual health professional to
provide medical, dental, vision or mental health services.
(b) “Medical services contract” does not include a contract of employment or a contract creat-
ing a legal entity and ownership of the legal entity that is authorized under ORS chapter 58, 60 or
70 or under any other law authorizing the creation of a professional organization similar to those
authorized by ORS chapter 58, 60 or 70, as may be prescribed by the authority by rule.
(8) “Net patient revenue” means the total amount of revenue, after allowance for contractual
amounts, charity care and bad debt, received for patient care and services, including:
(a) Value-based payments;
(b) Incentive payments;
(c) Capitation payments or payments under any similar contractual arrangement for the pre-
payment or reimbursement of patient care and services; and
[15]

HB 4003
(d) Any payment received by a hospital to reimburse a hospital assessment under ORS 414.855.
(9) “Revenue” means:
(a) Net patient revenue; or
(b) The gross amount of premiums received by a health care entity that are derived from health
benefit plans.
(10) “Transaction” means:
(a) A merger of a health care entity with another entity;
(b) An acquisition of one or more health care entities by another entity;
(c) New contracts, new clinical affiliations and new contracting affiliations that will eliminate
or significantly reduce, as defined by the authority by rule, essential services;
(d) A corporate affiliation involving at least one health care entity; or
(e) Transactions to form a new partnership, joint venture, accountable care organization, parent
organization or management services organization, as prescribed by the authority by rule.
SECTION 11. ORS 415.500, as amended by section 21, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended
to read:
415.500. As used in this section and ORS 415.501 and 415.505:
(1) “Corporate affiliation” has the meaning prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,
including:
(a) Any relationship between two organizations that reflects, directly or indirectly, a partial or
complete controlling interest or partial or complete corporate control; and
(b) Transactions that merge tax identification numbers or corporate governance.
(2) “Essential services” means:
(a) Services that are [funded on the prioritized list described in ORS 414.690] covered under the
state medical assistance program, as determined under ORS 414.065 and 414.690; and
(b) Services that are essential to achieve health equity.
(3) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(4)(a) “Health care entity” includes:
(A) An individual health professional licensed or certified in this state;
(B) A hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015, or hospital system, as defined by the authority by rule;
(C) A carrier, as defined in ORS 743B.005, that offers a health benefit plan in this state;
(D) A Medicare Advantage plan;
(E) A coordinated care organization or a prepaid managed care health services organization, as
both terms are defined in ORS 414.025; and
(F) Any other entity that has as a primary function the provision of health care items or ser-
vices or that is a parent organization of, or is an entity closely related to, an entity that has as a
primary function the provision of health care items or services.
(b) “Health care entity” does not include:
(A) Long term care facilities, as defined in ORS 442.015.
(B) Facilities licensed and operated under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(5) “Health equity” has the meaning prescribed by the Oregon Health Policy Board and adopted
by the authority by rule.
(6)(a) “Material change transaction” means:
(A) A transaction in which at least one party had average revenue of $25 million or more in the
preceding three fiscal years and another party:
(i) Had an average revenue of at least $10 million in the preceding three fiscal years; or
[16]

HB 4003
(ii) In the case of a new entity, is projected to have at least $10 million in revenue in the first
full year of operation at normal levels of utilization or operation as prescribed by the authority by
rule.
(B) If a transaction involves a health care entity in this state and an out-of-state entity, a
transaction that otherwise qualifies as a material change transaction under this paragraph that may
result in increases in the price of health care or limit access to health care services in this state.
(b) “Material change transaction” does not include:
(A) A clinical affiliation of health care entities formed for the purpose of collaborating on clin-
ical trials or graduate medical education programs.
(B) A medical services contract or an extension of a medical services contract.
(C) An affiliation that:
(i) Does not impact the corporate leadership, governance or control of an entity; and
(ii) Is necessary, as prescribed by the authority by rule, to adopt advanced value-based payment
methodologies to meet the health care cost growth targets under ORS 442.386.
(D) Contracts under which one health care entity, for and on behalf of a second health care
entity, provides patient care and services or provides administrative services relating to, supporting
or facilitating the provision of patient care and services, if the second health care entity:
(i) Maintains responsibility, oversight and control over the patient care and services; and
(ii) Bills and receives reimbursement for the patient care and services.
(E) Transactions in which a participant that is a health center as defined in 42 U.S.C. 254b,
while meeting all of the participant’s obligations, acquires, affiliates with, partners with or enters
into any agreement with another entity unless the transaction would result in the participant no
longer qualifying as a health center under 42 U.S.C. 254b.
(7)(a) “Medical services contract” means a contract to provide medical or mental health services
entered into by:
(A) A carrier and an independent practice association;
(B) A carrier, coordinated care organization, independent practice association or network of
providers and one or more providers, as defined in ORS 743B.001;
(C) An independent practice association and an individual health professional or an organization
of health care providers;
(D) Medical, dental, vision or mental health clinics; or
(E) A medical, dental, vision or mental health clinic and an individual health professional to
provide medical, dental, vision or mental health services.
(b) “Medical services contract” does not include a contract of employment or a contract creat-
ing a legal entity and ownership of the legal entity that is authorized under ORS chapter 58, 60 or
70 or under any other law authorizing the creation of a professional organization similar to those
authorized by ORS chapter 58, 60 or 70, as may be prescribed by the authority by rule.
(8) “Net patient revenue” means the total amount of revenue, after allowance for contractual
amounts, charity care and bad debt, received for patient care and services, including:
(a) Value-based payments;
(b) Incentive payments; and
(c) Capitation payments or payments under any similar contractual arrangement for the pre-
payment or reimbursement of patient care and services.
(9) “Revenue” means:
(a) Net patient revenue; or
[17]

HB 4003
(b) The gross amount of premiums received by a health care entity that are derived from health
benefit plans.
(10) “Transaction” means:
(a) A merger of a health care entity with another entity;
(b) An acquisition of one or more health care entities by another entity;
(c) New contracts, new clinical affiliations and new contracting affiliations that will eliminate
or significantly reduce, as defined by the authority by rule, essential services;
(d) A corporate affiliation involving at least one health care entity; or
(e) Transactions to form a new partnership, joint venture, accountable care organization, parent
organization or management services organization, as prescribed by the authority by rule.
SECTION 12. ORS 741.340 is amended to read:
741.340. The Oregon Health Authority, in developing and offering the health benefit package
required by ORS 413.011 (1)(j), may not establish policies or procedures that discourage insurers
from offering more comprehensive health benefit plans that provide greater consumer choice at a
higher cost. The health benefit package approved by the Oregon Health Policy Board shall:
(1) Promote the provision of services through an integrated health home model that reduces
unnecessary hospitalizations and emergency department visits.
(2) Require little or no cost sharing for evidence-based preventive care and services, such as
care and services that have been shown to prevent acute exacerbations of disease symptoms in in-
dividuals with chronic illnesses.
(3) Create incentives for individuals to actively participate in their own health care and to
maintain or improve their health status.
(4) Require a greater contribution by an enrollee to the cost of elective or discretionary health
services.
(5) Include a defined set of health care services that are affordable, financially sustainable and
[based upon the prioritized list of health services developed and updated by the Health Evidence Re-
view Commission under ORS 414.690] managed according to the clinical coverage policies de-
veloped under ORS 414.690.
SECTION 13. ORS 414.694 is repealed.
SECTION 14. (1) As used in this section, “coordinated care organization” and “medical
assistance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall study:
(a) How the authority and coordinated care organizations can effectuate coverage deci-
sions in the state medical assistance program based on the clinical coverage policies devel-
oped under ORS 414.690.
(b) Areas for potential alignment between the authority’s fee-for-service payment system
and the Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care Delivery System established in ORS
414.570 that are compliant with federal law and within existing resources of the authority.
(3) The authority and the Health Evidence Review Commission shall study the impli-
cations and feasibility of developing, as part of the clinical coverage policies developed under
ORS 414.690, diagnosis and treatment code pairings that indicate which health services are
not medically necessary or appropriate for particular conditions.
(4) The authority and the commission shall submit a report in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245 on the results of the studies conducted under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health care no later
[18]

HB 4003
than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 15. Section 14 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 16. (1) As used in this section, “coordinated care organization,” “health ser-
vices” and “medical assistance” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 414.025.
(2) As part of the transition away from using the prioritized list of health services to
determine the coverage of health services in the medical assistance program pursuant to the
amendments to ORS 414.690 by section 4 of this 2026 Act, the Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Ensure that clinical coverage policies and other guidance developed by the Health
Evidence Review Commission are published on a single webpage and readily accessible to in-
terested parties, including but not limited to coordinated care organizations and providers.
(b) Develop tailored technical assistance and other materials for interested parties, in-
cluding but not limited to medical assistance recipients, providers and coordinated care or-
ganizations.
(c) Direct the Health Evidence Review Commission to evaluate the availability of relevant
utilization data and the resources necessary to leverage existing utilization data to inform
the commission’s clinical coverage policies developed under ORS 414.690.
(d) Consult with actuaries for the state medical assistance program to review data as
expeditiously as possible after January 1, 2027, to ensure there is sufficient data for devel-
oping medical assistance rates for 2028.
(e) Report the authority’s findings under paragraph (d) of this subsection to:
(A) The Medicaid Advisory Committee established under ORS 414.211;
(B) The committee convened by the authority related to quality and health outcomes;
(C) The workgroup convened by the authority to collaborate with coordinated care or-
ganizations on pharmacy policies; and
(D) The beneficiary advisory committee convened by the authority to receive input from
medical assistance recipients.
SECTION 17. Section 16 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 18. (1) The amendments to ORS 414.025, 414.065, 414.325, 414.689, 414.690,
414.698, 414.701, 414.735, 414.780, 415.500 and 741.340 by sections 1 to 12 of this 2026 Act become
operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority and the Health Evidence Review Commission may take
any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is neces-
sary to enable the authority and the commission to exercise, on and after the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred
on the authority and the commission by the amendments to ORS 414.025, 414.065, 414.325,
414.689, 414.690, 414.698, 414.701, 414.735, 414.780, 415.500 and 741.340 by sections 1 to 12 of this
2026 Act.
SECTION 19. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[19]